District of Columbia statutes.
47-2887.17

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform part, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-107, § 3, 49 DCR 1193)
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 18 of the Uniform Athlete Agents Act.